Alabama, session 2026rs, SB6.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 41-9-233 and 41-9-235 of the Code
of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§41-9-233
(a) No person may prevent the governmental entity
having responsibility for maintaining any architecturally
significant building, memorial building, memorial school,
memorial street, or monument from taking proper and
appropriate measures, and exercising proper and appropriate
means, for the protection, preservation, care, repair, or
restoration of those monuments, streets, or buildings.
(b) If any architecturally significant building or
memorial building is razed, the governmental entity
responsible for the building shall ensure that any replacement
building or resulting park or green space maintains the name
of the original building. If the building is not replaced, the
Page 2

of the original building. If the building is not replaced, the
SB6 INTRODUCED
governmental entity shall erect a marker to memorialize the
person or event for which the memorial building was originally
named."
"§41-9-235
(a)(1) Any entity exercising control of public property
on which an architecturally significant building, memorial
building, memorial school, memorial street, or monument is
located may petition the committee for a waiver from
subsection (b) or subsection (c) of Section 41-9-232 (b) or
(c) through an application including, at a minimum, all of the
following:
a. A resolution by the controlling entity seeking a
waiver for the renaming of a memorial school or for the
relocation, removal, alteration, renaming, or other
disturbance of the architecturally significant building,
memorial building, memorial street, or monument and the
reasons therefor.
b. Written documentation of the origin of the
architecturally significant building, memorial building,
memorial school, memorial street, or monument, the intent of
the sponsoring entity at the time of dedication, and any
subsequent alteration, renaming, or other disturbance of the
architecturally significant building, memorial building,
memorial street, or monument.
c. Written commentary from any heritage, historical,
genealogical, or preservation organizations with interest in
the decision of the controlling entity, and from the general
public.
Page 3

public.
SB6 INTRODUCED
d. A written statement of any facts that were not known
at the time of the origin of the architecturally significant
building, memorial building, memorial school, memorial street,
or monument, but are known now, that the committee should
consider in granting the waiver. The absence of such facts
should serve as a presumption against the granting of a waiver
by the committee.
(2)a. If the committee grants a waiver, the committee
may provide reasonable conditions and instructions to ensure
that the architecturally significant building, memorial
building, memorial school, memorial street, or monument is
restored or preserved to the greatest extent possible.
b.(b) In the event there is a need for emergency
repairs or construction at the site of or to the
architecturally significant building, memorial building,
100 memorial street, or monument or on adjacent property, the
101 controlling entity may temporarily relocate or otherwise
102 protect the architecturally significant building, memorial
103 building, memorial street, or monument without seeking a
104 waiver under the process provided in this section; provided,
105 the architecturally significant building, memorial building,
106 memorial street, or monument shall be returned to its prior
107 location or condition, or both, as soon as safely and
108 reasonably possible, and no later than one year after the
109 completion of the repair or construction. If the repair or
110 construction is expected to take more than one year, the
111 controlling entity shall seek a waiver under the process
112 specified in this section.
Page 4

specified in this section.
SB6 INTRODUCED
113 c.(c) If the committee fails to act on a completed
114 application for a waiver within 90 days after the application
115 is submitted to the committee, the waiver shall be deemed
116 granted denied.
117 d.(d) If the Attorney General determines that an entity
118 exercising control of public property has renamed a memorial
119 school or has relocated, removed, altered, renamed, or
120 otherwise disturbed an architecturally significant building,
121 memorial building, memorial street, or monument from that
122 public property without first obtaining a waiver from the
123 committee as required by this article, or failed to comply
124 with the conditions and instructions issued by the committee
125 upon the grant of a waiver pursuant to this section, the
126 entity shall be fined twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000)
127 five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day that the violation
128 continues and until the entity has taken full restorative
129 action to comply with the requirements of this article. The
130 Attorney General may also commence a civil action to enjoin a
131 threatened or continuing violation of this article. Upon
132 written request of the entity and the submission of supporting
133 documentation that restoration has begun, the Attorney General
134 may stay the fine pending complete restoration. The fine shall
135 be collected by the Attorney General, forwarded by his or her
136 office to the State Treasurer, and deposited into the Alabama
137 State Historic Preservation Fund created in Section 41-9-255.
138 e.(e) Judicial review of the final decision of the
139 committee may be sought pursuant to the Alabama Administrative
140 Procedure Act, Chapter 22 of this title."
Page 5

Procedure Act, Chapter 22 of this title."
SB6 INTRODUCED
141 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
142 1, 2026.
Page 6